Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act
66-29-109. Presumption of abandonment of contents of safe deposit boxes.

The following property related to safe deposit boxes is presumed abandoned:

Any surplus amount resulting from the sale or disposal of safe deposit contents by banking institutions under § 45-2-907, if the proceeds cannot be credited to an existing customer account upon sale, and any unsold contents. Any credit of such proceeds to a customer account is not deemed to be account activity under § 66-29-113; and

For any person, other than a bank, savings and loan association, or savings bank, any funds or personal property removed from a safe deposit box, a safekeeping repository or agency, or a collateral deposit box as the result of the expiration or termination of a lease or rental period due to nonpayment of rental charges or for any other reason, and that have been unclaimed by the owner for more than two (2) years from the date on which the lease or rental period expired or terminated, including any surplus amount arising from the sale thereof, pursuant to law, that has been unclaimed by the owner for one (1) year.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any military medal that is removed from a safe deposit box, a safekeeping repository or agency, or a collateral deposit box as a result of the expiration or termination of a lease or rental period due to nonpayment of rental charges or for any other reason, must not be sold or otherwise disposed of, and must be retained by the holder for the lessee of the box. If the military medal remains unclaimed by the lessee for more than one (1) year from the date the box is opened, the holder shall report such property to the state treasurer by November 1 of the subsequent calendar year. The report must comply with § 66-29-123. The holder shall deliver, with the report, the military medal to the state treasurer for safekeeping in accordance with § 66-29-145.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-109 was transferred to §66-29-110.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-110. Presumption of abandonment of stored-value card.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-113, a stored-value card other than a payroll card or a gift card is presumed abandoned five (5) years after the later of:

December 31 of the year in which the card is issued or additional funds are deposited into it;

The most recent indication of interest in the card by the apparent owner; or

A verification or review of the balance by or on behalf of the apparent owner.

The amount abandoned by the owner in a stored-value card is the net card value at the time it is presumed abandoned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-110 was transferred to §66-29-111.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-111. Presumption of abandonment of security.

Except as otherwise provided in § 66-29-113, a security is presumed abandoned three (3) years after:

The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by first-class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or

If the second communication is made later than thirty (30) days after the first communication is returned, the date the first communication is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal service.

If the apparent owner of a security does not receive communications from the holder by first-class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner's interest in the security by sending the apparent owner an electronic mail communication not later than two (2) years after the apparent owner's indication of interest in the security. If the holder receives notification that the electronic mail communication was not received, or if the apparent owner does not respond to the electronic mail communication within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent, the holder shall promptly attempt to contact the apparent owner by first-class United States mail. If the mail is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal service, the security is presumed abandoned three (3) years after the date the mail is returned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-111 was transferred to §66-29-112.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-112. Presumption of abandonment of related property.

At the time an interest in property is presumed abandoned under this part, any other property right accrued or accruing to the apparent owner as a result of the interest, and not previously presumed abandoned, is also presumed abandoned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §66-29-112 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, § 12; T.C.A., § 64-2912), concerning reciprocity for property presumed abandoned or escheated under the laws of another state, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 544, § 9, effective December 31, 1984.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Unclaimed or abandoned vehicles, title 55, ch. 16.

66-29-113. Indication of apparent owner's interest in property.

Property is not presumed abandoned if the apparent owner indicates an interest in the property during the applicable periods under this part.

Under this part, an indication of an apparent owner's interest in property includes:

A record communicated by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held;

An oral communication by the apparent owner to the holder or agent of the holder concerning the property or the account in which the property is held if the holder or its agent contemporaneously makes and preserves a record of the fact of the apparent owner's communication;

Presentment of a check or other instrument of payment of a dividend, interest payment, or other distribution, or evidence of receipt of a distribution made by electronic or similar means, with respect to:

An account;

An underlying security; or

An interest in a business association;

Activity directed by an apparent owner in the account in which the property is held, including accessing the account or information concerning the account, or instruction by the apparent owner to increase, decrease, or otherwise change the amount or type of property held in the account;

Making a deposit into or withdrawal from an account at a financial organization, including an automatic deposit or withdrawal previously authorized by the apparent owner, other than an automatic reinvestment of dividends or interest;

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e), payment of a premium on an insurance policy;

Any other action by the apparent owner which reasonably demonstrates to the holder that the apparent owner is aware that the property exists; and

The apparent owner has another property with the holder to which § 66-29-105(a)(5) applies, for which the name and address on file with the holder for the apparent owner is the same, and for which the apparent owner has:

Communicated in writing with the holder; or

Otherwise indicated an interest under this section and if the holder communicates in writing with the apparent owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be abandoned at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent.

An action by an agent or other representative of an apparent owner, other than the holder acting as the apparent owner's agent, is presumed to be an action on behalf of the apparent owner.

A communication with an apparent owner by a person other than the holder or the holder's representative is not an indication of interest in the property by the apparent owner unless a record of the communication evidences the apparent owner's knowledge of a right to the property.

The application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy is not an indication of interest in the policy and does not prevent the policy from maturing or terminating if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy otherwise has become entitled to the proceeds before depletion of the cash surrender value of the policy by application of the provision.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

Cross-References. Unclaimed or abandoned vehicles, title 55, ch. 16.

66-29-114. Knowledge of death of insured or annuitant.

As used in this section, “death master file” means the federal social security administration death master file or other database or service that is at least as comprehensive as the death master file for determining that a person reportedly has died.

With respect to a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract for which an amount is owed on proof of death, but which has not matured by proof of death of the insured or annuitant, the company has knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant when:

The company receives a death certificate or a court order determining that the insured or annuitant has died;

Due diligence performed to maintain contact with the insured or annuitant, or to determine whether the insured or annuitant has died, results in validation of the death of the insured or annuitant;

A comparison is conducted by the company for any purpose between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company's insureds or annuitants, and a match is found providing notice that the insured or annuitant has died and the company validates the death;

A comparison is conducted by the treasurer or the treasurer's agent for the purpose of finding matches during an examination conducted under § 66-29-157 between a death master file and the names of some or all of the company's insureds or annuitants, and a match is found providing notice that the insured or annuitant has died and the company validates the death; or

The company:

Receives notice of the death of the insured or annuitant from an administrator, beneficiary, policy owner, relative of the insured, or trustee, or from a personal representative, executor, or other legal representative of the insured's or annuitant's estate; and

Validates the death of the insured or annuitant.

The following provisions apply to a death master file comparison under subdivisions (b)(3) and (b)(4):

A death master file match occurs if the criteria for a match are satisfied as provided by the Unclaimed Life Insurance Benefits Act, compiled in title 56, chapter 7, part 34;

A death master file match does not constitute proof of death for purposes of submission of a claim by a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract to an insurance company for amounts due under an insurance policy or annuity contract;

A death master file match under subdivision (b)(3) or (b)(4), or validation of the insured's or annuitant's death, does not alter the requirements for a beneficiary, annuitant, or owner of the policy or contract to make a claim to receive proceeds under the terms of the policy or contract; and

In the event a death master file match occurs, the insurance company that has a potential obligation as a result of the death of the insured or annuitant shall comply with the requirements of § 56-7-3404(b) upon discovering the match.

This part does not affect the determination of the extent to which an insurance company before July 1, 2017 had knowledge of the death of an insured or annuitant, or was required to conduct a death master file comparison, or the determination of the extent to which the treasurer or the treasurer's agent before July 1, 2017 was authorized to conduct a comparison for the purpose of finding matches during an examination under § 66-29-157, and to determine whether amounts owed by the company on a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract were presumed abandoned or unclaimed. An insurance company shall comply with, and the treasurer or the treasurer's agent may conduct an examination to ensure compliance with, the requirements of § 56-7-3404.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-115. Deposit account for proceeds of insurance policy or annuity contract.

If proceeds payable under a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract are deposited into an account with check or draft writing privileges for the beneficiary of the policy or contract, and the proceeds are retained by the insurance company or its agent under a supplementary contract not involving annuity benefits other than death benefits, the policy or contract includes the assets in the account.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-116. Last known address of apparent owner.

Under this part:

The last known address of an apparent owner is any description, code, or other indication of the location of the apparent owner that identifies the state of residence, regardless of whether the description, code, or indication of location is sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner;

If the United States postal zip code associated with the apparent owner is for a post office located in this state, this state is deemed to be the state of the last known address of the apparent owner unless other records associated with the apparent owner specifically indicate that the physical address of the apparent owner is located in a different state;

If records indicate that the address of the apparent owner is located in a different state in accordance with subdivision (2), the different state is deemed to be the state of the last known address of the apparent owner; and

The address of the apparent owner of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract or its proceeds is presumed to be the address of the insured or annuitant if a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the amount owed under the policy or contract and the address of the other person is not known by the insurance company and cannot be identified under § 66-29-117.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-117. Treasurer's custody of property presumed abandoned.

The treasurer may take custody of property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or in a foreign country if:

The last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is located in this state; or

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity or last known address of the apparent owner, and the treasurer has determined that the last known address of the apparent owner is located in this state.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-118. Custody of property presumed abandoned if records show multiple addresses of apparent owner.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if records of a holder reflect multiple addresses for an apparent owner and if this state is the state of the most recently recorded address, this state may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state or another state.

If it appears from records of the holder that the most recently recorded address of the apparent owner under subsection (a) is a temporary address and if this state is the state of the next most recently recorded address that is not a temporary address, this state may take custody of property presumed abandoned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-119. Custody of property presumed abandoned if holder domiciled in state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), § 66-29-117, or § 66-29-118, the treasurer may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or a foreign country, if the holder is domiciled in this state, or is the state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state, and:

Another state or foreign country is not entitled to the property because there is no last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property in the records of the holder; or

The state or foreign country in which the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is located does not provide for custodial taking of the property.

The property is not subject to the custody of the treasurer under subsection (a) if:

The property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state or foreign country in which the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is located; or

The property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of this state.

For the purposes of this section, if the holder's state of domicile has changed since the time the property was presumed abandoned, the holder's state of domicile is deemed to be the state where the holder was domiciled at the time the property was presumed abandoned.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-120. Custody of property presumed abandoned if transaction took place in this state.

Except as otherwise provided in §§66-29-117 —66-29-119, the treasurer may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this or another state, if:

The transaction involving the property occurred in this state;

The holder is domiciled in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property; provided, that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state of the holder's domicile, the property is not subject to the custody of the treasurer; and

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown or in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property; provided, that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state in which the last known address is located, the property is not subject to the custody of the treasurer.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-121. Custody of traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument presumed abandoned.

The treasurer may take custody of sums payable on a traveler's check, money order, or similar instrument presumed abandoned to the extent permissible under 12 U.S.C. §§ 2501 — 2503.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 937, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.

66-29-122. Burden of proof to establish treasurer's right to custody.

When the treasurer asserts a right to custody of unclaimed property, the treasurer has the burden to prove:

The existence and amount of the property;

The property is presumed abandoned; and

The property is subject to the custody of the treasurer.

Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 66, ch. 29, part 1, §§66-29-101—69-29-155 (Acts 1978, ch. 561, §§ 1-11; 1978, ch. 561, § 13-24; 1978, ch. 561, §§ 26-31, 33; T.C.A., §§ 64-2901—64-2910,66-29-103—66-29-110; T.C.A., §§ 64-2911,66-29-111; T.C.A., §§ 64-2913—64-2924, §66-29-124; T.C.A., §§ 64-2926—64-2932, §§66-29-126—66-29-132; Acts 1979, ch. 226, § 22; 1980, ch. 448, §§ 1-4; 1980, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1980, ch. 813, § 1; 1982, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 78, §§ 1-5; 1984, ch. 544, §§ 1-8, 10-12; 1985, ch. 401, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 539, §§ 11-19; 1987, ch. 43, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 485, § 1; 1989, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 194, §§ 1-3; Acts 1991, ch. 222, § 1; 1993, ch. 195, §§ 1-18; 1994, ch. 773, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 445, §§ 1-4; 1996, ch. 642, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 146; 1997, ch. 353, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 297, § 1; 1997, ch. 536, § 1; 1998, ch. 1010, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 1, 4-8; 2001, ch. 157, §§ 1-7; 2001, ch. 231, §§ 2, 3; 2001, ch. 291, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 2005, ch. 141, § 2; 2006, ch. 611, § 1; 2007, ch. 291, § 1; 2008, ch. 937, § 1; 2010, ch. 756, § 1; 2010, ch. 791, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 285, §§ 1-5; 2016, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3, repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 1, 2017) concerned the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed (Personal) Property Act.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 457, § 7. July 1, 2017; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 25, 2017.